District of Columbia statutes.
8-1041.11

Limitation in the event of a federal program.

Upon the establishment and implementation of a federal program for the collection and recycling or reuse of covered electronic equipment discarded by households, §§ 8-1041.01, 8-1041.02, 8-1041.03, 8-1041.04, 8-1041.05, 8-1041.06, 8-1041.07, 8-1041.08, 8-1041.09, and 8-1041.10 shall not apply to that covered electronic equipment.

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 125, 61 DCR 9971